dev/proper-noun/proper-noun.ne.dix
  <!-- सुरेन्द्र; सुरेन्द्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सुरेन्द्र__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खड्का; खड्का; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खड्का__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कर्ण; कर्ण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कर्ण__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मोरङ; मोरङ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मोरङ__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- व्यास; व्यास; 1 -->
    <pardef n="व्यास__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अधिकारी; अधिकारी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अधिकारी__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शारदा; शारदा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शारदा__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मञ्जु; मञ्जु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मञ्जु__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सतीदेवी; सतीदेवी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सतीदेवी__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुवेदी; सुवेदी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सुवेदी__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वसन्ती; वसन्ती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वसन्ती__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आचार्य; आचार्य; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आचार्य__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मेची; मेची; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मेची__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जीवन; जीवन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जीवन__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दिनेश; दिनेश; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दिनेश__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- काभ्रे; काभ्रे; 1 -->
    <pardef n="काभ्रे__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बाग्लुङ; बाग्लुङ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बाग्लुङ__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="सुरेन्द्र"><i>सुरेन्द्र</i><par n="सुरेन्द्र__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="खड्का"><i>खड्का</i><par n="खड्का__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="कर्ण"><i>कर्ण</i><par n="कर्ण__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="मोरङ"><i>मोरङ</i><par n="मोरङ__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="व्यास"><i>व्यास</i><par n="व्यास__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="अधिकारी"><i>अधिकारी</i><par n="अधिकारी__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="शारदा"><i>शारदा</i><par n="शारदा__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="मञ्जु"><i>मञ्जु</i><par n="मञ्जु__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सतीदेवी"><i>सतीदेवी</i><par n="सतीदेवी__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सुवेदी"><i>सुवेदी</i><par n="सुवेदी__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="वसन्ती"><i>वसन्ती</i><par n="वसन्ती__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="आचार्य"><i>आचार्य</i><par n="आचार्य__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="मेची"><i>मेची</i><par n="मेची__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="जीवन"><i>जीवन</i><par n="जीवन__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="दिनेश"><i>दिनेश</i><par n="दिनेश__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="काभ्रे"><i>काभ्रे</i><par n="काभ्रे__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="बाग्लुङ"><i>बाग्लुङ</i><par n="बाग्लुङ__np_nt_nn"/></e>
